Washington statutes.
RCW 7.64.010

Plaintiff may claim and obtain immediate delivery.

The plaintiff in an action to recover the possession of personal property may claim and obtain the immediate delivery of such property, after a hearing, as provided in this chapter.

The remedies provided under this chapter are in addition to any other remedy available to the plaintiff, including a secured creditor's right of self-help repossession.

[ 1990 c 227 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 132 s 1; Code 1881 s 142; 1877 p 30 s 142; 1869 p 35 s 140; 1854 p 150 s 100; RRS s 707.]